North Carolina, session 2025, HB89.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as "The University Vaccination Freedom Act."
SECTION 2. G.S. 130A-154(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a person who received
immunizations in a state other than North Carolina shall present an official certificate or record
of immunization to the child care facility, school (K-12), or college or university. facility or
school (K-12) of attendance. This certificate or record shall state the person's name, address, date
of birth, and sex; the type and number of doses of administered vaccine; the dates of the first
MMR and the last DTP and polio; the name and address of the physician or local health
department administering the required immunization; and other relevant information required by
the Commission."
SECTION 3. G.S. 130A-157 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-157. Religious exemption.
If the bona fide religious beliefs of an adult or the parent, guardian or person in loco parentis
of a child are contrary to the immunization requirements contained in this Chapter, the adult or
the child shall be exempt from the requirements. Upon submission of a written statement of the
bona fide religious beliefs and opposition to the immunization requirements, the person may
attend the college, university, school or facility without presenting a certificate of immunization."
SECTION 4. G.S. 130A-155.1 is repealed.
SECTION 5. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 academic year.
*H89-v-1*